Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 4. Risk Management.

Sec. 37.05.287.
Insurance for state assets.

The Department of Administration shall obtain or provide, in an amount and in the form that the department determines to be appropriate, casualty, property, and other insurance for protection of state assets and for the operation of state government. The department may provide for insurance coverage, in whole or in part, through a self-insurance program.

The Department of Administration shall annually review the state insurance program to ensure that, to the extent reasonable, adequate insurance coverage or reserves are maintained to satisfy all reasonably foreseeable claims or judgments for which payment may be due under the state insurance program during the next fiscal year. The department shall annually obtain an independent actuarial assessment of the state insurance program. No later than February 1 of each calendar year, the department shall submit to the presiding officers of each house of the legislature a review of the state insurance program, an independent actuarial assessment, and a certified audit of the state insurance catastrophe reserve account.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1987)

Sec. 37.05.289.
State insurance catastrophe reserve account.

There is established in the general fund a state insurance catastrophe reserve account consisting of assets appropriated to it by the legislature, assets allocated to the account by the Department of Administration as provided in this section, and amounts deposited into the account as provided in this section. Assets of the account may be used to obtain insurance, to establish reserves for the self-insurance program, and to satisfy claims or judgments arising under the program. Interest earned on money in the account shall be remitted to the Department of Revenue in accordance with AS

37.10.050

.

The Department of Administration may allocate to the state insurance catastrophe reserve account, from the appropriations to all state agencies for insurance-related purposes, an amount that the commissioner of administration determines to be necessary to provide an adequate insurance program for the operations of state government. Money remaining in the account at the end of a fiscal year is not a one-year appropriation under AS

37.25.010

and does not lapse, except for amounts determined by the commissioner of administration to be unnecessary to maintain this account at an appropriate level and not to exceed $5,000,000. If the amount necessary to satisfy claims or judgments for which payment may be due under the state insurance program in a fiscal year exceeds the unexpended balance of the amounts allocated to the account, the department may charge an additional amount from the unencumbered balance of any appropriation that is determined by the commissioner of administration to be available for lapse at the end of the fiscal year.

The $5,000,000 cap, set in (b) of this section, on money that may be retained in the state insurance catastrophe reserve account applies only to unobligated money in the account at the end of a fiscal year.

Amounts received in settlement of insurance claims or as recovery for losses shall be deposited into the state insurance catastrophe reserve account.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1987; am §§ 65, 66 ch 63 SLA 1993)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 87, ch. 63, SLA 1993 provides “[i]f any section of this bill is found to violate the single subject rule it is severed from the rest of the bill.”

Sec. 37.05.290.
Purpose of chapter. [Repealed, § 67 ch 106 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 37.05.300.
[Renumbered as AS 37.05.900.]

Sec. 37.05.305.
[Renumbered as AS 37.05.910.]

Sec. 37.05.310.
[Renumbered as AS 37.05.920.]